California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 reported in the taxable year from which the adjustment arose, rather than the taxable year in which the contract was
 completed.

(g) (1) For contracts entered into on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the amendments made by Section 13102(d) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for long-term contracts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) For contracts entered into on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the amendments made by Section 13102(e)(3) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to exemption from percentage completion for long-term contracts, shall apply, expect as otherwise provided.

(3) (A) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this paragraph shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision, where otherwise allowed, to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2018, in taxable years ending after January 1, 2018.

(h) The amendments to Section 460(c)(6)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 143(a)(2) and Section 143(b)(6)(I) of
 Public Law 114-113, relating to the special rule for federal long-term contracts, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 114.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24674.

(a) If, in the case of a taxpayer owning any non-interest-bearing obligation issued at a discount and redeemable for fixed amounts increasing at stated intervals the increase in the redemption price of such obligation occurring in the taxable year does not (under the method of accounting used in computing its
 income) constitute income to it in such year, such taxpayer may, at its election made in its return for any taxable year, treat such increase as income received in such taxable year. If any such election is made with respect to any such obligation, it shall apply also to all such obligations owned by the taxpayer at the beginning of the first taxable year to which it applies and to all such obligations thereafter acquired by it and shall be binding for all subsequent taxable years, unless on application by the taxpayer the Franchise Tax Board permits it, subject to such conditions as the Franchise Tax Board deems necessary, to change to a different method.

(b) In the case of any obligation—(1) Of the United States; or(2) Of a state,
 a territory, or a possession of the United States, or any political subdivision of any of the foregoing, or of the District of Columbia,which is issued on a discount basis and payable without interest at a fixed maturity date not exceeding one year from the date of issue, the amount of discount at which such obligation is originally sold shall not be considered to accrue until the date on which such obligation is paid at maturity, sold, or otherwise disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24675.

If an amount representing compensatory damages is received or accrued by a taxpayer during a taxable year as the result of an award in a civil action for infringement of a patent issued by the United States, then the tax attributable to the inclusion of such amount in gross income for the taxable year shall not be greater than the aggregate of the increases in taxes which would have resulted if such amount had been included in gross income in equal installments for each month during which such infringement occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24676.

(a) Prepaid subscription income to which this section applies shall be included in gross income for the taxable years during which the liability described in subsection (d)(2) exists.

(b) In the case of any prepaid subscription income to which this section applies—

(1) If the liability described in subsection (d)(2) ends, then so much of such income as was not includable in gross income under subsection (a)
 for preceding taxable years shall be included in gross income for the taxable year in which the liability ends.

(2) If the taxpayer ceases to be subject to tax measured by net income imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing at Section 23501) of this part, then so much of such income as was not includable in gross income under subsection (a) for preceding taxable years shall be included in the measure of tax for the last year in which the taxpayer is subject to the tax measured by net income imposed under Chapter 2 or Chapter 3 of this part.

(c) (1) This section shall apply to prepaid subscription income if and only if the taxpayer makes an election under this section with respect to the trade or business in connection with which such income is received. The election shall be made in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board
 may by regulations prescribe. No election may be made with respect to a trade or business if in computing net income the cash receipts and disbursements method of accounting is used with respect to such trade or business.

(2) An election made under this section shall apply to all prepaid subscription income received in connection with the trade or business with respect to which the taxpayer has made the election; except that the taxpayer may, to the extent permitted under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, include in gross income for the taxable year of receipt the entire amount of any prepaid subscription income if the liability from which it arose is to end within 12 months after the date of receipt. An election made under this section shall not apply to any prepaid subscription income received before the first taxable year for which the election is made.

(3) (A) A taxpayer may, with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board, make an election under this section at any time.

(B) A taxpayer may, without the consent of the Franchise Tax Board, make an election under this section for his first taxable year (i) which begins after December 31, 1960, and (ii) in which it receives prepaid subscription income in the trade or business. Such election shall be made not later than the time prescribed by law for filing the return for the taxable year (including extensions thereof) with respect to which such election is made.

(4) An election under this section shall be effective for the taxable year with respect to which it is first made and for all subsequent taxable years, unless the taxpayer secures the consent of the Franchise Tax Board to the revocation of such
 election. For purposes of this part, the computation of net income under an election made under this section shall be treated as a method of accounting.

(d) For purposes of this section—

(1) The term “prepaid subscription income” means any amount (includable in gross income) which is received in connection with, and is directly attributable to, a liability which extends beyond the close of the taxable year in which such amount is received, and which is income from a subscription to a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical.

(2) The term “liability” means a liability to furnish or deliver a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical.

(3) Prepaid subscription income shall be treated as received during the taxable year for which it is includable in gross
 income under Section 24661 (without regard to this section).

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any taxpayer who has, for taxable years prior to the first taxable year to which this section applies, reported his income under an established and consistent method or practice of accounting for prepaid subscription income (to which this section would apply if an election were made) may continue to report his income for taxable years to which this part applies in accordance with such method or practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24676.5.

(a) A taxpayer who is on an accrual method of accounting may elect not to include in the gross income for the taxable year the income attributable to the qualified sale of any magazine, paperback, or record which is returned to the taxpayer before the close of the merchandise return period.

(b) For purposes of this section—

(1) The term “magazine” includes any other periodical.

(2) The term “paperback” means any book which has a flexible outer cover and the pages of which are affixed directly to such outer cover. Such term does not include a magazine.

(3) The term “record” means a disc, tape, or similar object on which musical, spoken, or other sounds are recorded.

(4) If a taxpayer makes qualified sales of more than one category of merchandise in connection with the same trade or business, this section shall be applied as if the qualified sales of each such category were made in connection with a separate trade or business. For purposes of the preceding sentence, magazines, paperbacks, and records shall each be treated as a separate category of merchandise.

(5) A sale of a magazine, paperback, or record is a qualified sale
 if—

(A) At the time of sale, the taxpayer has a legal obligation to adjust the sales price of such magazine, paperback, or record if it is not resold, and

(B) The sales price of such magazine, paperback, or record is adjusted by the taxpayer because of a failure to resell it.

(6) The amount excluded under this section with respect to any qualified sale shall be the lesser of—

(A) The amount covered by the legal obligation described in paragraph (5)(A), or

(B) The amount of the adjustment agreed to by the taxpayer before the close of the merchandise return period.

(7) (A) Except as provided in
 subparagraph (B), the term “merchandise return period” means, with respect to any taxable year—

(i) In the case of magazines, the period of 2 months and 15 days first occurring after the close of the taxable year, or

(ii) In the case of paperbacks and records, the period of 4 months and 15 days first occurring after the close of the taxable year.

(B) The taxpayer may select a shorter period than the applicable period set forth in subparagraph (A).

(C) Any change in the merchandise return period shall be treated as a change in the method of accounting.

(8) As prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the taxpayer may substitute, for the physical return of magazines, paperbacks, or records
 required by subdivision (a), certification or other evidence that the magazine, paperback, or record has not been resold and will not be resold if such evidence—

(A) Is in the possession of the taxpayer at the close of the merchandise return period, and

(B) Is satisfactory to the Franchise Tax Board.

(9) A repurchase by the taxpayer shall be treated as an adjustment of the sales price rather than as a resale.

(c) (1) This section shall apply to qualified sales of magazines, paperbacks, or records, as the case may be, if and only if the taxpayer makes an election under this section with respect to the trade or business in connection with which such sales are made. An election under this section may be made without the consent of the
 Franchise Tax Board. The election shall be made in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe and shall be made for any taxable year not later than the time prescribed by law for filing the return for such taxable year (including extensions thereof).

(2) An election made under this section shall apply to all qualified sales of magazines, paperbacks, or records, as the case may be, made in connection with the trade or business with respect to which the taxpayer has made the election. 

(3) An election under this section shall be effective for the taxable year for which it is made and for all subsequent taxable years, unless the taxpayer secures the consent of the Franchise Tax Board to the revocation of such election.

(4) Except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this section, for purposes of
 this subtitle, the computation of taxable income under an election made under this section shall be treated as a method of accounting.

(d) In applying Section 24723 with respect to any election under this section which applies to magazines, the period of taking into account any decrease in taxable income resulting from the application of subdivision (b) of Section 24721 shall be the taxable year for which the election is made and the four succeeding taxable years.

(e) (1) In the case of any election under this section which applies to paperbacks or records, in lieu of applying Sections 24721 through 24725, the taxpayer shall establish a suspense account for the trade or business for the taxable year for which the election is made.

(2) The opening balance of the account described in paragraph (1)
 for the first taxable year to which the election applies shall be the largest dollar amount of returned merchandise which would have been taken into account under this section for any of the three immediately preceding taxable years if this section had applied to such preceding three taxable years. This paragraph and paragraph (3) shall be applied by taking into account only amounts attributable to the trade or business for which such account is established.

(3) At the close of each taxable year the suspense account shall be—

(A) Reduced by the excess (if any) of—

(i) The opening balance of the suspense account for the taxable year, over

(ii) The amount excluded from gross income for the taxable year under subdivision (a), or

(B) Increased (but not in excess of the initial opening balance) by the excess (if any) of—

(i) The amount excluded from gross income for the taxable year under subdivision (a), over

(ii) The opening balance of the account for the taxable year.

(4) (A) In the case of any reduction under paragraph (3)(A) in the account for the taxable year, an amount equal to such reduction shall be excluded from gross income for such taxable year.

(B) In the case of any increase under paragraph (3)(B) in the account for the taxable year, an amount equal to such increase shall be included in gross income for such taxable year.

If the initial
 opening balance exceeds the dollar amount of returned merchandise which would have been taken into account under subdivision (a) for the taxable year preceding the first taxable year for which the election is effective if this section had applied to such preceding taxable year, then an amount equal to the amount of such excess shall be included in gross income for such first taxable year.

(5) The application of this subdivision with respect to a taxpayer which is a party to any transaction with respect to which there is nonrecognition of gain or loss to any party to the transaction by reason of Chapter 8 shall be determined as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(6) The amendments to this section made by the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after October 1, 1979.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24677.

(a) If an amount representing damages is received or accrued by a corporation during a taxable year as a result of an award in a civil action for breach of contract or breach of a fiduciary duty or relationship, then the tax attributable to the inclusion in gross income for the taxable year of that part of the amount that would have been received or accrued by the corporation in a prior taxable year or years but for the breach of contract, or breach of a fiduciary duty or relationship, shall not be greater than the aggregate of the
 increases in taxes that would have resulted had that part been included in gross income for that prior taxable year or years.

(b) A corporation in computing the tax shall be entitled to deduct all credits and deductions for depletion, depreciation, and other items to which it would have been entitled, had the income been received or accrued by the corporation in the year during which it would have received or accrued it, except for the breach of contract or for the breach of fiduciary duty or relationship. The credits, deductions, or other items referred to in the prior sentence, attributable to property, shall be allowed only with respect to that part of the award which represents the corporation’s share of income from the actual operation of the property.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply unless the amount representing damage is three thousand dollars ($3,000) or
 more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24678.

(a) If an amount representing damages is received or accrued during a taxable year as a result of an award in, or settlement of, a civil action brought under Section 4 of the act entitled “An act to supplement existing laws against unlawful restraints and monopolies, and for other purposes,” approved October 15, 1914 (commonly known as the Clayton Act), for injuries sustained by a corporation in its business or property by reason of anything forbidden in the antitrust laws, then the tax attributable to the inclusion of that amount in
 gross income for the taxable year shall not be greater than the aggregate of the increases in taxes which would have resulted if that amount had been included in gross income in equal installments for each month during the period in which the injuries were sustained by the corporation.

(b) This section shall apply to taxable years ending after June 23, 1961, but only with respect to amounts received or accrued after that date as a result of awards or settlements made after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 189.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24679.

For purposes of Sections 24675 through 24678, a fractional part of a month shall be disregarded unless it amounts to more than half a month, in which case it should be considered as a month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Year of Deduction [24681. - 24694.]

24681.

Section 461 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the general rule for taxable year of deduction, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 68.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24682.

Section 464 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on deductions for certain farming expenses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 69.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24685.

(a) In the case of any taxpayer who elected to have former Section 24685 apply for that taxpayer’s last taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1990, and who is required to change its method of accounting by reason of the amendments made by the act adding this section, each of the following shall apply:

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as having
 been made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The net amount of adjustments required by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 24631) to be taken into account by the taxpayer:

(A) Shall be reduced by the balance in the suspense account, under former Section 24685 as of the close of the last taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, and

(B) Shall be taken into account over the two taxable year period beginning with the taxable year following that last taxable year, as follows:The percentage to beIn the case of the:taken into account is:1st Year502nd Year50(b) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (a), if the period during which the adjustments are required to be taken into account under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 24631) is less than two years, those adjustments shall be taken into account ratably over the shorter period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24685.5.

(a) The amendment made by Section 7001(a) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-206) to Section 404(a)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, regarding determinations relating to deferred compensation, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(b) In the case of any taxpayer required by enactment of this section to change its method of accounting, for that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or
 after January 1, 2002, each of the following shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401):

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The net amount of the adjustments required to be taken into account by the taxpayer under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 24631) shall be taken into account ratably over the three taxable year period beginning with that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 56.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24688.

Section 467 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain payments for the use of property or services, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 70.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24689.

Section 468 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for mining and solid waste reclamation and closing costs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 71.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24690.

(a) The provisions of Section 468A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for nuclear decommissioning costs, shall be applicable, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The deduction allowed for the 1987 taxable year may include contributions to a fund that are required to bring the balance in that fund up to the balance it would have contained if allowable contributions had been made for the 1985 and 1986 taxable years.

(c) The provisions of Section 468A(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, which impose a tax upon the gross income of the Nuclear Decommissioning Reserve Fund, shall be modified for purposes of this part to provide that a tax shall be imposed upon the gross income of that fund for any taxable year at a rate equal to the rate in effect for that taxable year under Section 23501. The income tax imposed upon the gross income of the fund by this section is in lieu of any other tax imposed by this part or Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) upon or measured by that income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24691.

Section 465 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations of deductions to the amount at risk, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 11, Sec. 78.   Effective February 19, 1988.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 95 of Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

24692.

(a) Section 469 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to passive activity losses and credits limited, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 469(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for taxpayers in real property business, shall not apply.

(c) Section 469(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to passive activity credits, is modified to refer to the following credits:

(1) The credit for research expenses allowed by Section 23609.

(2) The credit for clinical testing expenses allowed by Section 23609.5.

(3) The credit for low-income housing allowed by Section 23610.5.

(4) The credit for certain wages paid (targeted jobs) allowed by Section 23621.

(d) Section 469(g)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that if all gain or loss realized on the disposition of the taxpayer’s entire interest in any passive activity (or former passive activity) is recognized, the excess of—

(1) The sum of—

(A) Any loss from that activity for that taxable year (determined after application of Section 469(b) of the Internal Revenue Code), plus

(B) Any loss realized on that disposition, over

(2) Net income or gain for the taxable year from all passive activities (determined without regard to losses described in paragraph (1)), shall be treated as a loss which is not from a passive activity.

(e) (1) For purposes of applying Section 469(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) offset for rental real estate activities, the dollar limitation specified in Section 469(i)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 dollar limitation, for the credit allowed under Section 23610.5, relating to low-income housing, shall not apply.

(2) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(f) Section 502 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514) shall apply.

(g) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987, Section 10212 of Public Law 100-203, relating to treatment of publicly traded partnerships under Section 469 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(h) The amendments to Section 469(k) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 2004 of Public Law 100-647, relating to separate application of section in case of publicly
 traded partnerships, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 159, Sec. 27.   (AB 101)   Effective July 31, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24693.

(a) Section 468B of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for designated settlement funds, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 468B(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, which imposes a tax upon the designated settlement fund, shall be modified for purposes of this part to provide that a tax shall be imposed upon the gross income of the fund at a rate equal to the rate in effect for the taxable year under Section 23501. The income tax imposed
 upon the gross income of the fund by this section is in lieu of any other tax imposed by this part or Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) upon or measured by that income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 73.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24694.

Section 470 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on deductions allocable to property used by governments or other tax-exempt entities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 71.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Inventories [24701. - 24710.]

24701.

(a) Section 471 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the general rule for inventories, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, amendments made by Section 13102(c) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 471 of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to the general rule for inventories, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019.

(c) Section 472 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to last-in, first-out inventories, shall apply, except as otherwise
 provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 33.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24708.

Section 474 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to simplified dollar-value LIFO method for certain small businesses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 75.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24710.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to mark to market accounting method for securities dealers, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 13233(c)(2)(C) of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66), relating to the effective date for changes in the mark to market accounting method for securities dealers, is modified to provide that the amount taken into account
 under Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be taken into account ratably over the five-taxable-year period beginning with the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(c) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for dealers in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that dealer in commodities for state purposes, a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(e) of the
 Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for dealers in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply, an election under Section 475(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that dealer in commodities for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5.

(d) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in securities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that trader in securities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, a separate election for state purposes
 with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in securities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, an election under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that trader in securities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5.

(e) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that trader in commodities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, a separate election for state purposes with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5, and the federal election with respect to that trade or business shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in commodities, to have Section 475 of
 the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, an election under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that trader in commodities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, and a separate election for state purposes with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5.

(f) (1) An election under Section 475(e) or (f) of the Internal Revenue Code made for federal purposes with respect to a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1998, shall be treated as having been made for state purposes with respect to the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(2) Section 1001(d)(4)(B) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997
 (Public Law 105-34), relating to the effective date for election of mark to market by securities traders and traders and dealers in commodities, is modified to provide that the requirement for timely identification shall be treated as timely made for state purposes if that identification is treated as timely made for federal purposes, and the amount taken into account under Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be taken into account ratably over the four-taxable-year period beginning with the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(g) In the case of any taxpayer required to change its method of accounting by the enactment of the act amending this subdivision, incorporating by reference to the amendments made by Section 7003 of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-206) to Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code, each of the following shall apply for purposes of
 this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401):

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The taxpayer shall not be required to change its method of accounting until the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(4) The net amount of the adjustments required to be taken into account by the taxpayer under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 24631) shall be taken into account ratably over the three taxable year period beginning with that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 57.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Adjustments Required by Changes in Method [24721. - 24726.]

24721.

(a) Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjustments required by changes in method of accounting, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 481(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjustments attributable to conversion from “S” corporation to
 “C” corporation, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 115.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24725.

The provisions of Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to allocation of income and deductions among taxpayers, shall be applicable, except as provided in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 25110) of Chapter 17.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1295, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24726.

Section 483 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to interest on certain deferred payments, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 77.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Natural Resources [24831. - 24831.]

24831.

(a) Subchapter I of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to natural resources, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, in the case of oil shale, shall not apply.

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to 10 percent, in the case of coal, shall not apply.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on percentage depletion in the case of oil and gas wells, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 38.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. Regulated Investment Companies, Real Estate Investment Trusts, Real Estate Mortgage Investment Conduits, and Financial Asset Securitization Investment Trusts [24870. - 24876.]

24870.

Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulated investment companies and real estate investment trusts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 37.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24871.

(a) (1) Section 852(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of tax on regulated investment companies, shall not apply.

(2) Every regulated investment company shall be subject to the taxes imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), except
 that its “net income” shall be equal to its “investment company income,” as defined in subdivision (b).

(3) (A) Section 851(d)(2)(C)(i)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “$12,500” for “$50,000.”

(B) Section 851(d)(2)(C)(i)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “the rate of tax specified in Section 23151” for the phrase “the highest rate of tax specified in section 11” contained therein.

(C) Section 851(d)(2)(C)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to administrative provisions, is modified by substituting the phrase “Article 3 of Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 19031), a tax imposed by this subparagraph shall be treated as a tax with respect to which the deficiency procedures of such article apply” for the phrase “subtitle F, a